New York, session 2025-2026, A11573.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision b of section 1309 of the New York city charter, 2 as added by chapter 604 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 b. Any agency may establish a mentoring program for small businesses 5 [in the] that perform construction [trades] or architectural or engi- 6 neering services related to construction. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 8 the amendments to subdivision b of section 1309 of the New York city 9 charter made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of 10 such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16048-02-6